Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,195
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,195 to 81-12,218 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rural Projects Act.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 19.